District of Columbia statutes.
50-2206.57

Mandatory-minimum periods.

(a)

A mandatory-minimum term of incarceration as provided in this subchapter shall be proven to the court by a preponderance of the evidence.

(b)

A person sentenced for an offense under this subchapter may be subjected to multiple mandatory-minimum terms of incarceration. Each mandatory-minimum term of incarceration must be served consecutively, except that no combination of mandatory- minimum terms of incarceration shall exceed the maximum penalty for the offense, including any applicable enhancements.

History

Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 3v
as added Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 103(e)(3), 59 DCR 12957

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-266 added this section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103(e)(3) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103(e)(3) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).